Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 9 Amendment of Articles of Incorporation

7-1.2-901.
Right to amend articles of incorporation.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation, from time to time, in any and all respects as is desired, to the extent that its articles of incorporation, as amended, contain only provisions that might be lawfully contained in original articles of incorporation filed as of the time of the filing of the amendment, and, if a change in shares or the rights of shareholders, or an exchange, reclassification, subdivision, combination or cancellation of shares or rights of shareholders is to be made, the provisions that may be necessary to effect the change, exchange, reclassification, subdivision, combination or cancellation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2.

7-1.2-902.
Right to amend legislative charters.

Any corporation created by special act of the general assembly, which is organized under this chapter, whose charter is subject to amendment or repeal at the will of the general assembly, may make amendment to its charter that corporations organized under this chapter may make to their articles of incorporation under §

7-1.2-901

. The proposed amendment is effected and evidenced in the same manner, by the same vote and upon the same terms and conditions as are prescribed in §§

7-1.2-903

and

7-1.2-904

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-903.
Procedure to amend articles of incorporation.

Amendments to a corporations articles of incorporation are made in the following manner:

The board of directors adopts a resolution setting forth the proposed amendment and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of shareholders, which may be either the annual or a special meeting. If no shares have been issued, the amendment is adopted by resolution of the board of directors and the provisions subsequently stated for adoption by shareholders do not apply. The resolution may incorporate the proposed amendment in restated articles of incorporation which contain a statement that, except for the designated amendment, the restated articles of incorporation correctly state without change the corresponding provisions of the articles of incorporation as previously amended, and that the restated articles of incorporation, together with the designated amendment, supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments to those articles.

Written notice stating the proposed amendment or a summary of the changes to be affected by the amendment must be given to each shareholder entitled to vote on the amendment within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of shareholders. If the meeting is an annual meeting, the proposed amendment or the summary may be included in the notice of the annual meeting.

At the meeting a vote of the shareholders entitled to vote on the amendment must be taken on the proposed amendment. The proposed amendment is adopted upon receiving the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote on the amendment unless any class of shares is entitled to vote on the amendment as a class, pursuant to either the articles of incorporation or the provisions of §

7-1.2-904

, in which event approval of the proposed amendment also requires the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares of each class of shares entitled to vote as a class on the amendment.

Any number of amendments may be submitted to the shareholders, and voted upon by them, at one meeting.

The resolution authorizing a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation may provide that at any time prior to the filing of the amendment with the secretary of state, notwithstanding authorization of the proposed amendment by the shareholders of the corporation, the board of directors may abandon the proposed amendment without further action by the shareholders.

Whenever the articles of incorporation require for action by the board of directors, by the holders of any class or series of shares or by the holders of any other securities having voting power the vote of a greater number or proportion than is required by any section of this title, the provision of the articles of incorporation requiring such greater vote may not be altered, amended or repealed except by such greater vote.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-904.
Class voting on amendments.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the holders of the outstanding shares of a class are entitled to vote as a class upon a proposed amendment, whether or not entitled to vote on the amendment by the provisions of the articles of incorporation, if the amendment would:

Increase or decrease the aggregate number of authorized shares of the class.

Increase or decrease the par value of the shares of the class.

Effect an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of all or part of the shares of the class.

Effect an exchange, or create a right of exchange, of all or any part of the shares of another class into the shares of the class.

Change the designations, preferences, limitations, or relative rights of the shares of the class.

Change the shares of the class, whether with or without par value, into the same or a different number of shares, either with or without par value, of the same class or another class or classes.

Create a new class of shares having rights and preferences prior and superior to the shares of the class, or increase the rights and preferences or the number of authorized shares of any class having rights and preferences prior or superior to the shares of the class.

In the case of a preferred or special class of shares, divide the shares of the class into series and fix and determine the designation of the series and the variations in the relative rights and preferences between the shares of the series, or authorize the board of directors to do so.

Limit or deny any existing preemptive rights of the shares of the class.

Cancel or otherwise affect dividends on the shares of the class which have accrued but have not been declared.

If the proposed amendment would affect only the shares of one series of a class and not the entire class, then only the shares of the series so affected is considered a separate class for the purpose of this section. Any class and any series within a class is considered a separate class for purposes of this section if the effect of the proposed amendment upon the class or series would be different than the effect of the amendment upon the other classes or other series within the class. If the proposed amendment would affect two (2) or more classes or series within a class in the same way, but would not affect the remaining classes or series within the class in the same way, the two (2) or more classes or series affected in the same way are together considered a separate class for purposes of this section. Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the certificate referred to in §

7-1.2-602

, if the proposed amendment would have no effect upon one or more classes or series of a class, the classes or series are not entitled to any vote on the proposed amendment and, for the purposes of this section, are not counted in determining the number of shares constituting the class.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-905.
Articles of amendment.

The corporation may amend its articles of incorporation by filing with the secretary of state articles of amendment which must state:

The name of the corporation.

The amendment so adopted.

The date of the adoption of the amendment by the shareholders or by the board of directors where no shares have been issued.

No amendment may affect any existing cause of action in favor of or against the corporation, or any pending suit to which the corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than shareholders; and, in the event the corporate name is changed by amendment, no suit brought by or against the corporation under its former name abates for that reason.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.

7-1.2-906.
Restated articles of incorporation.

The corporation may at any time restate its articles of incorporation as previously amended by filing with the secretary of state restated articles of incorporation. The restated articles of incorporation may include one or more amendments to the articles of incorporation adopted in accordance with the provisions of §

7-1.2-903

.

The restated articles of incorporation must state all of the provisions of the articles of incorporation as previously amended, the additional amendments to the articles of incorporation, if any, together with a statement that such additional amendments were adopted in accordance with the provisions of §

7-1.2-903

, and a further statement that, except for the designated amendments, if any, the restated articles of incorporation correctly set forth without change the corresponding provisions of the articles of incorporation as previously amended, and that the restated articles of incorporation, together with the designated amendments, if any, supersede the original articles of incorporation and all previous amendments to the articles of incorporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 36; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 36.

7-1.2-907.
Amendment of articles of incorporation in reorganization proceedings.

Whenever a plan of reorganization of a corporation has been confirmed by decree or order of a court of competent jurisdiction in proceedings for the reorganization of the corporation, pursuant to the provisions of any applicable statute of the United States relating to reorganizations of corporations, the articles of incorporation of the corporation may be amended, in the manner provided in this section, in as many respects as are necessary to carry out the plan and put into effect, as long as the articles of incorporation, as amended, contain only provisions that might be lawfully contained in original articles of incorporation at the time of making the amendment.

Articles of amendment approved by decree or order of the court must be executed by the trustee or trustees of such corporation appointed in the reorganization proceedings (or a majority thereof), or if none are appointed and acting, by the person or persons that the court designates or appoints for the purpose, and must state the name of the corporation, the amendments of the articles of incorporation approved by the court, the date of the decree or order approving the articles of amendment, the title of the proceedings in which the decree or order was entered, and a statement that the decree or order was entered by a court having jurisdiction of the proceedings for the reorganization of the corporation pursuant to the provisions of an applicable statute of the United States.

This section does not apply to such corporation upon the entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceedings closing the case and discharging the trustee or trustees, if any.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.